District of Columbia statutes.
42-3506.01

Conversion.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no person shall convert and the Mayor shall not permit the conversion of any housing accommodation or rental unit into a hotel, motel, inn, or other transient residential occupancy unit or accommodation.

History

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 601, 32 DCR 3089

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-2561.

Expiration of Law

Section 907 of D.C. Law 6-10, as amended by § 2(d) of D.C. Law 8-48 and § 818 of D.C. Law 11-52, provided that all subchapters of the act, except III and V, shall terminate on December 31, 2000.